Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.060

Bonds of other states.

A mutual savings bank may invest its funds in the bonds or obligations of any other state of the United States upon which there is no default.

[ 1955 c 13 s 32.20.060. Prior: 1937 c 95 s 2; 1929 c 74 s 5; 1921 c 156 s 11c; RRS s 3381-5.]